Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.26
Product-based exemption, defined.

Product-based exemption means an exemption based on the description of the product that is the subject of the transaction and not based on the identity of the person purchasing or selling the product or the ultimate use of the product.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 30.